California statutes. Education Code
Any warrant drawn on the funds of a district retirement system and issued to the claimant thereof but not presented for payment to the county treasurer within two years after it was issued is void and the proceeds of such warrants shall revert to and become a part of the contributions of the district and shall be applied to reduce the cost to the taxpayers of the district maintaining the retirement system. The county auditor shall each month inform the county superintendent of schools of warrants which have become void during the preceding month, and the county superintendent of schools shall transmit such information to the governing board of the community college district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85272.

The county superintendent of schools shall keep a record of all orders, or warrants which have become void.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Registration of Orders, Issuance of Warrants [85280. - 85288.]

85280.

When any order against the funds of a community college district is presented to the county superintendent of schools, and the order constitutes a valid claim against the funds of the district, and moneys are not available in the funds of the district from which to pay the order, the county superintendent shall endorse on the order the words “Not approved for want of funds,” and shall register the order in the records of his or her office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 33.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85281.

The county superintendent of schools shall number and date the registered order, and shall transmit the registered order to the governing board of the community college district that drew the order. The governing board shall deliver the registered order to the payee or to the order of the payee. From the date of registration, the registered order shall bear interest at the rate of 5 percent per annum until the date upon which notice is given, pursuant to this article, that the county superintendent of schools is ready to approve the registered order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 34.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85282.

Whenever moneys are available for the payment of the registered order, the county superintendent of schools shall give notice, in a newspaper published in the county, or if there is no newspaper, by written notice posted at the courthouse, stating that he or she is ready to approve the order. The notice may list any number of registered orders of one or more districts for the payment of which moneys are available, giving the name or names of the district or districts and listing the registered orders in the order of registration for each district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 35.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85283.

At the time of giving the notice the county superintendent of schools shall set aside in the funds of each district for a period of 60 days the amount necessary for the payment of the registered orders of the district listed in the notice. If any registered order is not presented to the county superintendent of schools for payment within 60 days after the notice has been given, and moneys are not available to pay the registered order at the time of presentation, it shall not be approved until money becomes available for that purpose and notice is again given that the county superintendent of schools is ready to pay it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85284.

The county superintendent of schools shall approve the registered orders of each district, and sign them as requisitions on the county auditor, in the order of their presentation. The county superintendent shall enter on each the amount of interest due and the total amount, including principal and interest, payable. Each approved registered order shall thereupon be governed by the procedure established in this code relative to payments from community college district funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 36.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85285.

As an alternative to the method provided in Section 85284, when any corporation, firm, or person presents two or more registered orders for payment at the same time, registered on the same date, and issued against the funds of the same district, the registered orders may be approved, allowed, and consecutively numbered by the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor as requisitions and warrants on the funds of the district, and a special interest requisition may be issued by the county superintendent of schools against the funds of the district for the total amount of the interest payable on the registered orders.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85286.

The special interest requisition shall bear upon its face substantially the following notation: “In full payment of interest due on warrants numbered ____ to ____, inclusive, of the ____ Community College District.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85287.

The special interest requisition shall be numbered by the county superintendent of schools and county auditor, being given the number immediately succeeding the number assigned to the last of the requisitions and warrants referred to in Section 85285.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85288.

The county superintendent of schools shall report to the county treasurer and the county auditor within 10 days after the end of each month the amount of the interest computed pursuant to this article. The report shall show each district for which interest has been computed, the numbers of the registered orders for which the interest is to be paid, and the total amount of the interest charged to each district. The county superintendent shall also, upon transmitting to the governing board of a community college district registered orders which have been approved and allowed as warrants against the funds of the district, report in writing to the clerk or secretary of the district the amount of interest computed on the registered orders and the numbers of the registered orders for which the interest is to be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 37.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Optional Method of Registering Warrants [85300. - 85304.]

85300.

In lieu of the method provided in Article 7 (commencing with Section 85280) of this chapter, inclusive, for the registration of community college district orders, the provisions of this article may be followed upon resolution adopted by the county board of supervisors of any county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85301.

When any order on community college district funds is received by the county superintendent of schools, and there is insufficient money in the fund or funds against which the order is drawn to pay the order in full, the county superintendent shall endorse on the order “to be registered for lack of sufficient funds,” sign, date, and number it as a requisition on the county auditor, and transmit the requisition to the county auditor. The county auditor shall endorse on the order “examined and allowed,” sign, date, and number it as a warrant on the county treasurer, and return the warrant to the county superintendent of schools, who shall transmit it to the governing board of the community college district for issuance to the payee or to his or her order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 38.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85302.

When the warrant is presented to the county treasurer for payment, he or she shall endorse, register, advertise, and pay it, with interest at the rate of 5 percent per annum, in the manner prescribed, as nearly as may be, for county warrants in Sections 29821 to 29824, inclusive, and Sections 29826 and 29827 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 39.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

85303.

If the warrants are not again presented for payment within 60 days from the time the notice provided for in Section 29823 of the Government Code is given, the fund set aside for the payment of the warrants shall be applied by the treasurer to the payment of unpaid warrants next in order of registry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

85304.

Within 10 days after the end of each month, the county auditor shall report to the superintendent of schools the amount of interest added to registered warrants and paid during the preceding month. The report shall show each district to whose registered warrants, paid during the month covered by the report, interest was added and the amount of the interest for the district. The superintendent of schools shall immediately report, in writing, to the clerk or secretary of each district for which interest was paid, the amount of the interest paid for the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 51. EMPLOYEES [87000. - 88280.]



  CHAPTER 1. Provisions Applying to All Employees [87000. - 87164.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [87000. - 87018.]

87000.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in Sections 87001 to 87011, inclusive, shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87001.

(a) Academic employee” refers to a person employed by a community college district in an academic position.

(b) “Academic position” includes every type of service, excluding paraprofessional service, for which minimum qualifications have been established by the board of governors pursuant to Section 87356.

(c) Wherever in this code or any other code, the term “certificated employee” or any similar term is used in reference to community college employees, it shall be deemed a reference to academic employees of the community colleges.

(d) Wherever in this code or any other code, the phrase “position requiring certification qualifications,” or any similar phrase is used in reference to positions in the community colleges, it shall be deemed a reference to academic positions in the community colleges. Nothing in this part shall be construed as repealing or negating any provisions in this code or any other code concerning employees of community college districts for purposes of retirement benefits under the State Teachers’ Retirement System by referring to those employees as academic employees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 2.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87001.5.

(a) “Classified position” includes every position that is a part of the classified service as defined in Sections 88003 and 88076.

(b) “Classified employee” refers to a person employed by a community college district in a classified position.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 4.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87002.

(a) “Administrator” means any person employed by the governing board of a community college district in a supervisory or management position as defined in Article 5 (commencing with Section 3540) of Chapter 10.7 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) “Educational administrator” means an administrator who is employed in an academic position designated by the governing board of the district as having direct responsibility for supervising the operation of or formulating policy regarding the instructional or student services program of the college or district. Educational administrators include, but are not limited to, chancellors, presidents, and other supervisory or management employees designated by the governing board as educational administrators.

(c) “Classified administrator” means an administrator who is not employed as an educational administrator.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 6.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87003.

(a) “Faculty” or “faculty member” means those employees of a community college district who are employed in academic positions that are not designated as supervisory or management for the purposes of Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code and for which minimum qualifications for service have been established by the board of governors adopted pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 70901 or subdivision (a) of Section 87356. Faculty include, but are not limited to, instructors, librarians, counselors, community college health services professionals, handicapped student programs and services professionals, extended opportunity programs and services professionals, and individuals employed to perform a service that, before July 1, 1990, required nonsupervisorial, nonmanagement community college certification qualifications. 

(b) Any employees who are employed in faculty positions but who perform supervisory, management, or other duties related to college governance shall not, because of the performance of those incidental duties, be deemed supervisors or managers, as those terms are defined in Section 3540.1 of the Government Code. The incidental “supervisory” or “management” duties referred to in this subdivision include, but are not limited to, serving as a faculty member on hiring, selection, promotion, evaluation, budget development, or affirmative action committees, or making effective recommendations in connection with those activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1038, Sec. 12.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

87008.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a termination of probation and dismissal of an accusation or information pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code shall not, for the purpose of this division, have any effect.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, no person shall be denied a hearing solely on the basis that he or she has been convicted of a crime if the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation under Section 4852.01 and following of the Penal Code, and if his or her probation has been terminated and the information or accusation has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 133.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87009.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a finding of guilt by a court in a trial without a jury is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of Sections 87405 and 88022 of this code, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the withdrawal of the plea of guilty and entering a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusations or information. The record of the conviction of a sex offense as defined in Section 87010 or of a controlled substance offense defined in Section 87011 shall be sufficient proof of conviction of a crime involving moral turpitude for the purposes of Sections 87667 and 87732 relating to the dismissal of permanent employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 13.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87010.

“Sex offense,” as used in Sections 87405, 88022, and 88123, means any one or more of the offenses listed below:

(a) Any offense defined in Section 261.5, 266, 267, 285, 286, 287, 288, or 647.6 of, or former Section 288a or 647a of, paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section
 261 of, paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 262 of, or subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 647 of, the Penal Code.

(b) Any offense defined in former subdivision 5 of former Section 647 of the Penal Code repealed by Chapter 560 of the Statutes of 1961, or any offense defined in former subdivision 2 of former Section 311 of the Penal Code repealed by Chapter 2147 of the Statutes of 1961, if the offense defined in those sections was committed
 prior to September 15, 1961, to the same extent that such an offense committed prior to that date was a sex offense for the purposes of this section prior to September 15, 1961.

(c) Any offense defined in Section 314 of the Penal Code committed on or after September 15, 1961.

(d) Any offense defined in former subdivision 1 of former Section 311 of the Penal Code repealed by Chapter 2147 of the Statutes of 1961 committed on or after September 7, 1955, and prior to September 15, 1961.

(e) Any offense involving lewd and lascivious conduct under Section 272 of the Penal Code committed on or after September 15, 1961.

(f) Any offense involving lewd and lascivious
 conduct under former Section 702 of the Welfare and Institutions Code repealed by Chapter 1616 of the Statutes of 1961, if the offense was committed prior to September 15, 1961, to the same extent that such an offense committed prior to that date was a sex offense for the purposes of this section prior to September 15, 1961.

(g) Any offense defined in Section 286 or former Section 288a of the Penal Code prior to the effective date of the amendment of either section enacted at the 1975–76 Regular Session of the
 Legislature committed prior to the effective date of the amendment.

(h) Any attempt to commit any of the above-mentioned offenses.

(i) Any offense committed or attempted in any other state that, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punishable as one or more of the above-mentioned offenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 17.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

87011.

“Controlled substance offense” as used in Sections 87405, 88022, and 88123 means any one or more of the following offenses:

(a) Any offense in Sections 11350 to 11355, inclusive, 11366, 11368, 11377 to 11382, inclusive, and 11550 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Any offense committed or attempted in any other state or against the laws of the United States which, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punished as one or more of the above-mentioned offenses.

(c) Any offense committed under former Sections 11500 to 11503, inclusive, 11557, 11715, and 11721 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Any attempt to commit any of the above-mentioned offenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 15.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87013.

Whenever a community college district employs a person in an academic position and that person has not previously been employed by a school or community college district in this state, the governing board may, within 10 working days of the person’s date of employment, require the individual to have duplicate personal identification cards upon which shall appear the legible fingerprints and a personal description of the employee prepared by a local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in the area of the district. The law enforcement agency shall transmit the cards, together with the fee hereinafter specified, to the Department of Justice. At the earliest opportunity following its receipt of the identification cards, the Department of Justice shall furnish the law enforcement agency submitting the employee’s fingerprints a complete criminal history of the individual if one appears in the department’s files. The local law enforcement agency shall, in turn, excerpt from the history all information regarding any convictions of the employee and shall forward that information to the governing board of the district.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a finding of guilt by a court in a trial without a jury or forfeiture of bail is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the withdrawal of the plea of guilty and entering of a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusations or information.

The governing board may provide the means whereby the identification cards may be completed and may charge a fee determined by the Department of Justice to be sufficient to reimburse the department for the costs incurred in processing the application. The amount of the fee shall be forwarded to the Department of Justice, with two copies of applicant’s or employee’s fingerprint cards. The governing board may collect an additional fee not to exceed two dollars ($2) payable to the local public law enforcement agency taking the fingerprints and completing the data on the fingerprint cards.

Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the Department of Justice, shall, as provided in this section, furnish, upon application of a local public law enforcement agency all information pertaining to any person required to submit personal identification cards pursuant to this section if there is a record of the person in its office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 17.   Effective September 25, 1990.   Note: See Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

87014.

(a) Whenever any employee of a community college district is attacked, assaulted, or menaced, by any student, it shall be the duty of that employee, and the duty of any person under whose direction or supervision the employee is employed who has knowledge of the incident, to promptly report the same to the appropriate law enforcement authorities of the county or city in which the same occurred. Failure to make the report shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200).

(b) An act by any member of the governing board of a community college district, or any employee of any community college district which is designed directly or indirectly to influence or urge a person under a duty to make the report prescribed by subdivision (a) not to make the report, shall be a misdemeanor, and shall be punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than two hundred dollars ($200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 18.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87017.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a community college district, from funds under its jurisdiction, may pay the surviving spouse of any employee who is murdered while in the course of his or her employment the amount that the deceased would have received if he or she had lived to complete the time remaining in his or her contract with the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 135.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87018.

(a) In addition to the benefits provided pursuant to Sections 395.01 and 395.02 of the Military and Veterans Code, any employee of a community college district who, as a member of the California National Guard or a United States Military Reserve organization, is called into active military duty, may receive, on approval of the governing board of the school district, the benefits provided for in subdivision (b).

(b) Any employee to which subdivision (a) applies, while on active duty, may receive from the community college employer, for a period not to exceed 180 calendar days, as part of his or her compensation, all of the following:

(1) The difference between the amount of his or her military pay and allowances and the amount the employee would have received as an employee, including any merit raises that would otherwise have been granted during the time the individual was on active military duty.

(2) All benefits that he or she would have received had he or she not been called to active military duty unless the benefits are prohibited or limited by vendor contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 783, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Rights and Duties [87031. - 87045.]

87031.

(a) Every employee has the right to inspect personnel records pursuant to Section 1198.5 of the Labor Code.

(b) In addition to subdivision (a), all of the following shall apply to an employee of a school district:

(1) Information of a derogatory nature shall not be entered into an employee’s personnel records unless and until the employee is given notice and an opportunity to review and comment on that information. The employee shall have the right to enter, and have attached to any derogatory statement, his or her own comments. The review shall take place during normal business hours and the employee shall be released from duty for this purpose without salary reduction.

(2) The employee shall not have the right to inspect personnel records at a time when the employee is actually required to render services to the district.

(3) Nothing in this section shall entitle an employee to review ratings, reports, or records that (A) were obtained prior to the employment of the person involved, (B) were prepared by identifiable examination committee members, or (C) were obtained in connection with a promotional examination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 886, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

87032.

The governing board of a community college district shall provide for the payment of the actual and necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, of any employee of the district incurred in the course of performing services for the district, whether within or outside the district, under the direction of the governing board. The board may authorize an advance of funds to cover such necessary expense. Such advance shall be repaid or adjusted upon filing of a regular claim for the actual and necessary expenses incurred. The governing board may direct any employee of the district to attend any convention or conference or to visit schools for the discussion or observation of any school matter appertaining to the duties of the employee or any question of interest to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 319.)
-------------------------------------------

87035.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may grant leaves of absence to employees to appear as a witness in court other than as a litigant or to respond to an official order from another governmental jurisdiction for reasons not brought about through the connivance or misconduct of the employee.

(b) The governing board of a community college district may grant leaves of absence to employees, in academic positions regularly called for jury duty in the manner provided for by law.

(c) The governing board may grant such leaves of absence with pay up to the amount of the difference between the employee’s regular earnings and any amount he or she receives for jury or witness fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 19.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87036.

The governing board of a community college shall grant leave of absence to any employee serving in a classified or other nonacademic position regularly called for jury duty in the manner provided for by law. The governing board shall grant such leave with pay up to the amount of the difference between the employee’s regular earnings and any amount he or she receives as juror’s fees.

It is unlawful for the governing board or personnel commission of any community college district to adopt or maintain any rule, regulation, or policy which has as its purpose or effect a tendency to encourage employees to seek exemption from jury duty, or to directly or by indirection solicit or suggest to any employee that he or she seek exemption from jury duty, or to discriminate against any employee with respect to assignment, employment, promotion, or in any other manner because of such employee’s service on any jury panel.

Nothing in the foregoing provisions shall preclude the district superintendent or his or her agent from discussing with the affected employee the practicality of seeking exemption when acceptance would tend to materially disrupt the district’s operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 20.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87038.5.

No contract with any insurer or other employee welfare benefit provider shall be approved or renewed if an administrative employee of a community college district, or any employee organization, as defined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3540.1 of the Government Code, or any employee or agent thereof, has a direct financial interest in any plan or program which is being approved or renewed. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any employee welfare benefit fund jointly administered by one or more employers and one or more employee organizations or to any employee welfare benefit fund established by the community college district for the purpose of self insuring.

As used in this section, “direct financial interest” means the receipt of or entitlement to a commission, fee, or other remuneration, including the payment of fees for administrative services rendered on behalf of such plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 433.)
-------------------------------------------

87039.

It shall be unlawful for any person authorized to invoke disciplinary action against any employee of a community college district either in his or her individual capacity or as a member of any board, to invoke or attempt to invoke disciplinary action against any such employee or to discriminate against such employee in the terms, conditions, and privileges of employment solely because of the employee’s appearance before the governing board of a district, the county board of education, legislative committees, or any other duly constituted governmental board, commission or council, whether such appearance was undertaken voluntarily or otherwise.

Violation of the provisions of this section shall be a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 322.)
-------------------------------------------

87040.

(a) (1) The governing board of each community college district when drawing an order for the salary payment due to employees of the district shall, without charge, reduce the order by the amount which it has been requested in a revocable written authorization by the employee to deduct for any or all of the following purposes:

(A) Paying premiums on any policy or certificate of group life insurance for the benefit of the employee or for group disability insurance, or legal expense insurance, or any of them, for the benefit of the employee or his or her dependents issued by an admitted insurer on a form of policy or certificate approved by the Insurance Commissioner.

(B) Paying rates, dues, fees, or other periodic charges on any hospital service contract for the benefit of the employee, or his or her dependents, issued by a nonprofit hospital service corporation on a form approved by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 11A (commencing with Section 11491) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(C) Paying periodic charges on any medical and hospital service agreement or contract for the benefit of the employee, or his or her dependents, issued by a nonprofit corporation subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of, Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of, or Part 11 (commencing with Section 10810) of, Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(D) Paying periodic charges on any legal services contract for the benefit of the employee, or his or her dependents issued by a nonprofit corporation subject to Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of, or Part 11 (commencing with Section 10810) of, Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to subdivision (b).

(b) For purposes of a deferred compensation plan authorized by Section 403(b) or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code or an annuity program authorized by Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code that is offered by the community college district which provides for investments in corporate stocks, bonds, securities, mutual funds, or annuities, except as prohibited by the California Constitution, the governing board of each community college district when drawing an order for the salary payment due to an employee of the district shall, with or without charge, reduce the order by the amount which it has been requested in a revocable written authorization by the employee to deduct for participating in a deferred compensation plan or annuity program offered by the community college district. The governing board shall determine the cost of performing the requested deduction and may collect that cost from the organization, entity, or employee requesting or authorizing the deduction. For purposes of this subdivision, the governing board of a community college district is entitled to include in the amounts reducing the order the costs of any compliance or administrative services that are required to perform the requested deduction in compliance with federal or state law, and may collect these costs from the participating employee, the employee’s participant account, or the organization or entity authorizing the deduction.

(c) The governing board of the district shall, beginning with the month designated by the employee and each month thereafter until authorization for the deduction is revoked, draw its order upon the funds of the district in favor of the insurer which has issued the policies or certificates or in favor of the nonprofit hospital service corporation which has issued hospital service contracts, or in favor of the nonprofit corporation which has issued medical and hospital service or legal service agreements or contracts, for an amount equal to the total of the respective deductions therefor made during the month. The governing board may require that the employee submit his or her authorization for the deduction up to one month in advance of the effective date of coverage.

(d) “Group insurance” as used in this section shall mean only a bona fide group program of life or disability or life and disability insurance where a master contract is held by the community college district or an employee organization but it shall, nevertheless, include annuity programs authorized by Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code when approved by the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

87040.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Annuity contract” means an annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code that is available to employees as described in Section 770.3 of the Insurance Code.

(2) “Custodial account” means a custodial account described in Section 403(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) “Deferred compensation plan” means a plan described in Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) “Third-party administrator” means a person or entity that provides administrative or compliance services to a community college district as described in subdivision (b).

(b) A community college district may enter into a written contract with a third-party administrator for services regarding an annuity contract and custodial account or a deferred compensation plan provided by the community college district. That contract may include any of the following:

(1) Services to ensure compliance with either Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code regarding the annuity contract and custodial account or Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code regarding a deferred compensation plan, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Administer and maintain written plan documents governing the community college district’s plan.

(B) Review and authorize hardship withdrawal requests under Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, transfer requests, loan requests, unforeseeable emergency withdrawals under Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code and other disbursements permitted under either Section 403(b) or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(C) Review and determine domestic relations orders as qualified domestic relations orders as described in Section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(D) Provide notice to eligible employees that is consistent with Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations that those employees may participate in an annuity contract and custodial account.

(E) Administer and maintain specimen salary reduction agreements for the community college district and employees of that community college district to initiate payroll deferrals.

(F) Monitor, from information provided either directly from the employee, as part of the common remitting services provided pursuant to paragraph (2), through information provided by the community college district, or through information provided by vendors authorized by the community college district to provide investment products, the maximum contributions allowed by employees participating in either the annuity contract and custodial account as described in Sections 402(g), 414(v), and 415 of the Internal Revenue Code or the deferred compensation plan as described in Section 414(v) or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(G) Calculate and maintain vesting information for contributions made by the community college district to the annuity contract and custodial account or deferred compensation plan.

(H) Identify and notify employees that are required to take a minimum distribution of the funds in that employee’s annuity contract and custodial account or deferred compensation plan as described in Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(I) Coordinate responses to the Internal Revenue Service if there is an Internal Revenue Service audit of the annuity contract and custodial account or deferred compensation plan.

(2) Services to administer the annuity contract and custodial account or a deferred compensation plan that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Common remitting services.

(B) General educational information to employees about the annuity contract and custodial account or the deferred compensation plan that includes, but is not limited to, the enrollment process, program eligibility, and investment options.

(C) Internal reports for the community college district to ensure compliance with either Section 403(b) or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code and compliance with Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(D) Consulting services related to the design, operation, and administration of the plan.
